Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.430

Resignation and removal of officers.

(1) An officer may resign at any time by delivering a written notice to the board of directors, its chairperson, or to the appointing officer or the secretary of the corporation. A resignation is effective as provided in RCW 23B.01.410(9) unless the notice provides for a delayed effectiveness, including effectiveness determined upon a future event or events. If effectiveness of a resignation is stated to be delayed and the board of directors or the appointing officer accepts the delay, the board of directors or the appointing officer may fill the pending vacancy before the delayed effectiveness but the new officer may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

(2) The board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause. An officer or assistant officer may be removed by:

(a) An appointing officer at any time with or without cause, unless the bylaws or the board of directors provide otherwise; or

(b) Any other officer if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

(3) In this section, "appointing officer" means the officer, including any successor to that officer, who appointed the officer resigning or being removed.

[ 2020 c 57 s 62; 1989 c 165 s 103.]